firefox/corrector_de_galego-volga/dictionaries/gl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 813 Y 97
SFX 813 r r/134,135 ír . P1 / P3 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 r ndo/134,135 ír . [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 r do/10,15 ír .
SFX 813 ír io [ao]ír . P1
SFX 813 aír áio/666,130,131 aír . P1 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óio/666,130,131 oír . P1 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir io/666,130,131 óir . P1 + enclítico
SFX 813 uír úo/130,131 uír . P1 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír es [ao]ír . P2
SFX 813 aír áes/666,132,133 aír . P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óes/666,132,133 oír . P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir es/666,132,133 óir . P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 uír úes/132,133 uír . P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír e [ao]ír . P3
SFX 813 aír áe/666,134,135 aír . P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óe/666,134,135 oír . P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir e/666,134,135 óir . P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 uír úe/134,135 uír . P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 r mos/136,137 ír . P4 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 r des/138,139 ír . P5 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír en [ao]ír . P6
SFX 813 aír áen/666,134,135 aír . P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óen/666,134,135 oír . P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir en/666,134,135 óir . P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 uír úen/134,135 uír . P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír ía/130,131,134,135 ír . P1 / P3 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír ías/132,133 ír . P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír ïamos ír . P4
SFX 813 ír ïámos/666,136,137 ír . P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír ïades ír . P5
SFX 813 ír ïádes/666,138,139 ír . P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír ían/134,135 ír . P6 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír ín/130,131 ír . P1 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír íches/132,133 ír . P2
SFX 813 ír íu/134,135 ír . P3 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír ímos/136,137 ír . P4 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír ístes/138,139 ír . P5 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír íron/134,135 ír . P6 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 0 a/130,131,134,135 ír . P1 / P3 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 0 as/132,133 ír . P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír iramos ír . P4
SFX 813 ír irámos/666,136,137 ír . P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír irades ír . P5
SFX 813 ír irádes/666,138,139 ír . P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 0 an/134,135 ír . P6 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír irei/130 ír . P1 [ + enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 813 ír iréi/666,131 ír . P1 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 813 ír irás/133 ír . P2 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 813 ír iras/666,132 ír . P2 + enclítico monosílabo
SFX 813 ír irá/135 ír . P3 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 813 ír ira/666,134 ír . P3 + enclítico monosílabo
SFX 813 ír iremos ír . P4
SFX 813 ír irémos/666,136,137 ír . P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír iredes ír . P5
SFX 813 ír irédes/666,138,139 ír . P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír irán/135 ír . P6 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 813 ír iran/666,134 ír . P6 + enclítico monosílabo
SFX 813 ír iría/130,131,134,135 ír . P1 / P3 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír irías/132,133 ír . P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír iriamos ír . P4
SFX 813 ír iriámos/666,136,137 ír . P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír iriades ír . P5
SFX 813 ír iriádes/666,138,139 ír . P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír irían/134,135 ír . P6 [ + enclítico]
SFX 813 ír ia [ao]ír . presente P1 / P3
SFX 813 uír úa/130,131,134,135 uír . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 aír áia/666,130,131,134,135 aír . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óia/666,130,131,134,135 oír . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir ia/666,130,131,134,135 óir . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír ias [ao]ír . presente P2
SFX 813 uír úas/132,133 uír . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 aír áias/666,132,133 aír . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óias/666,132,133 oír . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir ias/666,132,133 óir . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír iamos [ao]ír . presente P4
SFX 813 ír iámos/666,136,137 [ao]ír . presente P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír amos uír . presente P4
SFX 813 ír ámos/666,136,137 uír . presente P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír iades [ao]ír . presente P5
SFX 813 ír iádes/666,138,139 [ao]ír . presente P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír ades uír . presente P5
SFX 813 ír ádes/666,138,139 uír . presente P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 ír ian [ao]ír . presente P6
SFX 813 uír úan/134,135 uír . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 aír áian/666,134,135 aír . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 oír óian/666,134,135 oír . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 ir ian/666,134,135 óir . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 r se/130,131,134,135 ír . pretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 813 r ses/132,133 ír . pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 r semos/136,137 ír . pretérito P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 r sedes/138,139 ír . pretérito P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 r sen/134,135 ír . pretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 0 es/132,133 ír . / subxuntivo futuro P2 + enclítico
SFX 813 0 mos/136,137 ír . / subxuntivo futuro P4 + enclítico
SFX 813 0 des/138,139 ír . / subxuntivo futuro P5 + enclítico
SFX 813 0 en/134,135 ír . / subxuntivo futuro P6 + enclítico
SFX 813 r de/138,139 ír . P5
SFX 814 Y 42
SFX 814 ir o [^cu]ir . P1
SFX 814 ir o [^g]uir . P1
SFX 814 guir go guir . P1
SFX 814 cir zo cir . P1
SFX 814 r mos ir . P4
SFX 814 ir ímos/666,136,137 ir . P4 + enclítico
SFX 814 r des ir . P5
SFX 814 ir ídes/666,138,139 ir . P5 + enclítico
SFX 814 ir ín/131 ir . P1 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 814 ir in/666,130 ir . P1 + enclítico monosílabo
SFX 814 ir a [^cu]ir . presente P1 / P3
SFX 814 ir a [^g]uir . presente P1 / P3
SFX 814 cir za cir . presente P1 / P3
SFX 814 guir ga guir . presente P1 / P3
SFX 814 ir as [^cu]ir . presente P2
SFX 814 cir zas cir . presente P2
SFX 814 guir gas guir . presente P2
SFX 814 quir cas quir . presente P2
SFX 814 ir amos [^cu]ir . presente P4
SFX 814 ir ámos/666,136,137 [^cu]ir . presente P4 + enclítico
SFX 814 ir amos [^g]uir . presente P4
SFX 814 ir ámos/666,136,137 [^g]uir . presente P4 + enclítico
SFX 814 cir zamos cir . presente P4
SFX 814 cir zámos/666,136,137 cir . presente P4 + enclítico
SFX 814 guir gamos guir . presente P4
SFX 814 guir gámos/666,136,137 guir . presente P4 + enclítico
SFX 814 ir ades [^cu]ir . presente P5
SFX 814 ir ádes/666,138,139 [^cu]ir . presente P5 + enclítico
SFX 814 ir ades [^g]uir . presente P5
SFX 814 ir ádes/666,138,139 [^g]uir . presente P5 + enclítico
SFX 814 cir zades cir . presente P5
SFX 814 cir zádes/666,138,139 cir . presente P5 + enclítico
SFX 814 guir gades guir . presente P5
SFX 814 guir gádes/666,138,139 guir . presente P5 + enclítico
SFX 814 ir an [^cu]ir . presente P6
SFX 814 ir an [^g]uir . presente P6
SFX 814 cir zan cir . presente P6
SFX 814 guir gan guir . presente P6
SFX 814 ir e [^cu]ir . P2
SFX 814 ir e [^g]uir . P2
SFX 814 guir gue guir . P2
SFX 814 cir ce cir . P2
SFX 815 Y 17
SFX 815 ir o/666,132,133 [^cu]ir . P1 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir o/666,132,133 [^g]uir . P1 + enclítico
SFX 815 cir zo/666,132,133 cir . P1 + enclítico
SFX 815 guir go/666,132,133 guir . P1 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir a/666,130,131,134,135 [^cu]ir . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir a/666,130,131,134,135 [^g]uir . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 815 cir za/666,130,131,134,135 cir . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 815 guir ga/666,130,131,134,135 guir . presente P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir as/666,132,133 [^cu]ir . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir as/666,132,133 [^g]uir . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 815 cir zas/666,132,133 cir . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 815 guir gas/666,132,133 guir . presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir an/666,134,135 [^cu]ir . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir an/666,134,135 [^g]uir . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 815 cir zan/666,134,135 cir . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 815 guir gan/666,134,135 guir . presente P6 + enclítico
SFX 815 ir e/666,134,135 ir . P2 + enclítico
SFX 816 Y 3
SFX 816 ir es ir . P2
SFX 816 ir e ir . P3
SFX 816 ir en ir . P6
SFX 817 Y 3
SFX 817 ir es/666,132,133 ir . P2 + enclítico
SFX 817 ir e/666,134,135 ir . P3 + enclítico
SFX 817 ir en/666,134,135 ir . P6 + enclítico
SFX 820 Y 6
SFX 820 r mos ir . P4
SFX 820 ir ímos/666,136,137 ir . P4 + enclítico
SFX 820 r des ir . P5
SFX 820 ir ídes/666,138,139 ir . P5 + enclítico
SFX 820 ir ín/131 ir . P1 [ + enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 820 ir in/666,130 ir . P1 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 821 Y 3
SFX 821 ir es ir . P2
SFX 821 ir e ir . P3
SFX 821 ir en ir . P6
